Washington statutes.
RCW 23.86.100

Bylaws.

Any association subject to this chapter may pass bylaws to govern itself in the carrying out of the provisions of this chapter which are not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter.

[ 1989 c 307 s 24; 1913 c 19 s 19; RRS s 3922. Formerly RCW 23.56.100.]

NOTES:

Legislative finding—1989 c 307: See note following RCW 23.86.007.